Idaho, session 2026, H0924.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Liquor Division the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes from the
Liquor Control Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR:
Operating Expenditures $498,300
Capital Outlay 1,174,700
TOTAL $1,673,000
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.